Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.480

Certificate of registration or authorization suspension—Noncompliance with support order—Reissuance.

The board shall immediately suspend the certificate of registration or certificate of authorization to practice architecture of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a *residential or visitation order. If the person has continued to meet other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the certificate shall be automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the individual is in compliance with the order.

[ 1997 c 58 s 813.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1997 c 58 s 886 requiring a court to order certification of noncompliance with residential provisions of a court-ordered parenting plan was vetoed. Provisions ordering the department of social and health services to certify a responsible parent based on a court order to certify for noncompliance with residential provisions of a parenting plan were vetoed. See RCW 74.20A.320.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.